Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1565.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Instructions in Firearm Safety.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each school entity shall offer instruction in firearm safety to all students in each grade from kindergarten through twelve. The instruction must be:(1) Age appropriate to the grade level of the student.(2) Offered in a politically neutral manner.(b) The department shall, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police and the Pennsylvania Game Commission, 1234567891011121314151617181920 develop curriculum guidelines on firearm safety. The guidelines, at a minimum, shall include information on:(1) The safe handling of firearms.(2) The safe storage of firearms.(3) The proper steps to take when encountering a firearm.(4) The dangers of misusing a firearm.(5) The benefits of firearms and the recreational activities that can be completed with firearms.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Firearm." As follows:(1) Any weapon designed to, or readily convertible to, expel a projectile by the action of an explosive.(2) The frame or receiver of a weapon under paragraph (1)."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1565PN1850 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920